Mississippi, session 2026, HB512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is established the Rural Physicians Retention Loan Repayment Program for physicians serving in rural hospitals, clinics and communities in Mississippi. (2)  An eligible applicant for an initial award must: (a)  Be a legal resident of the State of Mississippi; (b)  Have gained employment or secured contractual work as a full-time physician: (i)  At a general acute care hospital within a super rural ZIP code, as designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or a clinic affiliated with a general acute care hospital within a super rural ZIP code; (ii)  At a Rural Emergency Hospital (REH), as designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or a clinic affiliated with a Rural Emergency Hospital; (iii)  At a Critical Access Hospital (CAH), as designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or a clinic affiliated with a Critical Access Hospital; (iv)  At a general acute care hospital or an affiliated clinic in Bolivar, Coahoma, Carroll, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Panola, Quitman, Sharkey, Sunflower, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tunica, Washington or Yazoo Counties; or (v)  In a community within the State of Mississippi with a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or fewer people, according to the most recent federal decennial census; (c)  Possess a current unencumbered license from the State Board of Medical Licensure; and (d)  Possess outstanding qualifying educational loans received at any point during the recipient's postsecondary educational career, which may include the principal, interest and related expenses, such as the required interest premium on the unpaid balances of government and commercial loans obtained by the recipient for educational expense. (3)  The hospital or clinic where a recipient is serving must be located in the State of Mississippi and licensed by the State Department of Health.  The hospital, clinic or community where the recipient is serving shall not be in a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the U.S. Census Bureau. (4)  Subject to the availability of funds, annual awards for eligible recipients who are employed at a hospital or affiliated clinic described under subsections (2)(b)(i) through (2)(b)(iv) and (3) of this section ("qualifying hospital or clinic") are as follows: (a)  Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) for the initial award; (b)  Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00) for the second award; (c)  Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the third award; (d)  Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00) for the fourth award; and (e)  Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for the fifth award. (5)  Subject to the availability of funds, annual awards for eligible recipients who are employed in a community described under subsections (2)(b)(v) and (3) of this section ("qualifying community") are as follows: (a)  Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the initial award; (b)  Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the second award; (c)  Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00) for the third award; (d)  Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) for the fourth award; and (e)  Seventeen Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($17,500.00) for the fifth award. (6)  In order to be eligible to receive an award established in subsection (4) or (5) of this section for the next succeeding year, a recipient must retain eligibility during each year of the program. (7)  Persons who have received funds from a state forgivable loan program established under the laws of this state or who are in default or delinquent on a federal, state, local or commercial qualifying educational loan shall not be eligible for the program. (8)  Initial recipients in the program shall be selected on a first-come, first-served basis from all eligible applicants, subject to the availability of funds.  However, priority consideration shall be given to: (a)  Recent graduates of a school of medicine accredited by the State of Mississippi; (b)  Students enrolled in a medical school in this state on July 1, 2026; (c)  Students and physicians who are participating in the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program created under Section 37-144-1 et seq. on June 30, 2026, but only if the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Commission and the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board enter into an agreement providing for an equitable transition from the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program to the Rural Physicians Retention Loan Repayment Program that fairly addresses all rights and obligations of a particular recipient and the state; (d)  Licensed physicians practicing in a qualifying hospital, clinic or community that has not been a beneficiary of the program for the three (3) preceding years; (e)  Licensed physicians practicing in a qualifying hospital or clinic described in subsections (2)(b)(i) through (2)(b)(iv) of this section; and (f)  Licensed physicians practicing in obstetrics or a specialty that is not currently available in the community in which the recipient is serving. (9)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board may limit the acceptance of applications and limit the number of awards for any fiscal year. (10)  A recipient shall not be penalized for ending employment at one (1) qualifying hospital or clinic or in one (1) qualifying community if the recipient begins working at another qualifying hospital or clinic or in another qualifying community during the same year for which the award was given.  However, if the recipient is moving from a qualifying hospital or clinic as described in subsections (2)(b)(i) through (2)(b)(iv) of this section to a qualifying community described in section (2)(b)(v) of this section, the award shall be based on the award amount corresponding with the year of service provided in subsection (5) of this section. (11)  Awards shall be granted to eligible recipients on an annual basis.  A recipient who fails to retain eligibility shall not receive subsequent awards authorized under subsection (4) or (5) of this section. (12)  Upon completion of each year for which an award was granted, the applicable award for that year shall be paid to the recipient's lender or loan service provider to be applied to the outstanding balance of the recipient's loans.  Monies paid by the recipient or on the recipient's behalf toward qualifying educational loans before the payment of an award shall not be eligible for reimbursement through the program. (13)  During the employment year for which an award is granted, a recipient shall keep the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board informed of any changes to the recipient's current employment or contract information and status at all times. (14)  Recipients who fail to maintain a current unencumbered license from the State Board of Medical Licensure or to fulfill the year of employment or contractual work on which an award was based shall forfeit all rights to that award. (15)  The Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, in collaboration with the State Department of Health and any other state agency determined applicable by the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, shall track each recipient of an award under the program through the sixth year after the recipient receives an initial award unless the recipient leaves employment at a qualifying hospital, clinic or community at an earlier date.  Data collected shall include each recipient's place of employment and any other pertinent information necessary to determine the efficacy of the program in retaining physicians employed in rural hospitals and clinics in the state. (16)  The Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the proper administration of the program, including rules for ensuring that the expenses of the program during a fiscal year do not exceed funding available for the program in that fiscal year. (17)  There is established in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Rural Physicians Retention Loan Repayment Program Fund, into which are deposited those funds appropriated by the Legislature and any other funds, including, but not limited to, funds from the Rural Health Transformation Fund, Public Law No. 119-21, that may be made available for the purpose of implementing the loan repayment program established under this section.  Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the General Fund, and interest earned on any amounts deposited into the fund must be credited to the special fund.  All monies shall be disbursed in compliance with applicable state and federal law and guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time. SECTION 2. (1)  There is established the Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program for dentists serving in rural communities in Mississippi.  Such program shall be known and may be cited as the Dr. G. Norris Howell Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program. (2)  An eligible applicant for an initial award must: (a)  Be a legal resident of the State of Mississippi; (b)  Have gained employment or secured contractual work as a full-time dentist: (i)  In a community located in Bolivar, Coahoma, Carroll, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Panola, Quitman, Sharkey, Sunflower, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tunica, Washington or Yazoo Counties; or (ii)  In a community within the State of Mississippi with a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or fewer people, according to the most recent federal decennial census. (c)  Possess a current unencumbered license from the State Board of Dental Examiners; and (d)  Possess outstanding qualifying educational loans received at any point during the recipient's postsecondary educational career, which may include the principal, interest and related expenses, such as the required interest premium on the unpaid balances of government and commercial loans obtained by the recipient for educational expense. (3)  The clinic or other health care facility where a recipient is serving must be licensed by the State Department of Health.  The community where the recipient is serving may not be in a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the U.S. Census Bureau. (4)  Subject to the availability of funds, annual awards for eligible recipients who are employed in a community described in subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section are as follows: (a)  Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) for the initial award; (b)  Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00) for the second award; (c)  Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the third award; (d)  Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00) for the fourth award; and (e)  Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for the fifth award. (5)  Subject to the availability of funds, annual awards for eligible recipients who are employed in a community described in subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section are as follows: (a)  Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the initial award; (b)  Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the second award; (c)  Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00) for the third award; (d)  Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) for the fourth award; and (e)  Seventeen Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($17,500.00) for the fifth award. (6)  In order to be eligible to receive an award established in subsection (4) or (5) of this section for the next succeeding year, a recipient must retain eligibility during each year of the program. (7)  Persons who have received funds from a state forgivable loan program established under the laws of this state or who are in default or delinquent on a federal, state, local or commercial qualifying educational loan shall not be eligible for the program. (8)  Initial recipients in the program shall be selected on a first-come, first-served basis from all eligible applicants, subject to the availability of funds.  However, priority consideration shall be given to: (a)  Recent graduates of a school of dentistry accredited by the State of Mississippi; (b)  Students enrolled in a school of dentistry in this state on July 1, 2026; (c)  Students and dentists who are participating in the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program created under Section 37-146-1 et seq. on June 30, 2026, but only if the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Commission and the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board enter into an agreement providing for an equitable transition from the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program to the Mississippi Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program that fairly addresses all rights and obligations of a particular recipient and the state; (d)  Licensed dentists practicing in a qualifying county or community that has not been a beneficiary of the program for the three (3) preceding years; and (e)  Licensed dentists practicing in a community described in subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section. (9)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board may limit the acceptance of applications and limit the number of awards for any fiscal year. (10)  A recipient shall not be penalized for ending employment in one (1) qualifying county or community if the recipient begins working at another qualifying county or community during the same year for which the award was given.  However, if the recipient is moving from a clinic or other health care facility in a qualifying community described in subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section to a clinic or other health care facility in a qualifying community described in section (2)(b)(ii) of this section, the award shall be based on the award amount corresponding with the year of service provided in subsection (5) of this section. (11)  Awards shall be granted to eligible recipients on an annual basis.  A recipient who fails to retain eligibility may not receive subsequent awards authorized under subsection (4) or (5) of this section. (12)  Upon completion of each year for which an award was granted, the applicable award for that year shall be paid to the recipient's lender or loan service provider to be applied to the outstanding balance of the recipient's loans.  Monies paid by the recipient or on the recipient's behalf toward qualifying educational loans before the payment of an award shall not be eligible for reimbursement through the program. (13)  During the employment year for which an award is granted, a recipient shall keep the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board informed of any changes to the recipient's current employment or contract information and status at all times. (14)  Recipients who fail to maintain a current unencumbered license from the Mississippi State Board of Dental Examiners or fail to fulfill the year of employment or contractual work on which an award was based forfeit all rights to that award. (15)  The Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, in collaboration with the State Department of Health and any other state agency determined applicable by the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, shall track each recipient of an award under the program through the sixth year after the recipient receives an initial award unless the recipient leaves employment in a qualifying county or community.  Data collected shall include each recipient's place of employment and any other pertinent information necessary to determine the efficacy of the program in retaining dentists employed in rural communities in the state. (16)  The Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the proper administration of the program, including rules for ensuring that the expenses of the program during a fiscal year do not exceed funding available for the program in that fiscal year. (17)  There is established in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated the Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program Fund, into which are deposited those funds appropriated by the Legislature and any other funds, including, but not limited to, funds from the Rural Health Transformation Fund, Public Law No. 119-21, that may be made available for the purpose of implementing the loan repayment program established under this section.  Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the General Fund, and interest earned on any amounts deposited into the fund must be credited to the special fund.  All monies shall be disbursed in compliance with applicable guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and/or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the state and federal government. SECTION 3. (1)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the State Department of Health, in collaboration with the Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board and any other state agency determined applicable by the department, shall develop a communications and marketing plan to recruit students, physicians and dentists to apply for the Rural Physicians Retention Loan Repayment Program and the Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program, and to ensure relevant qualifying hospitals, clinics and other health care facilities across the state are aware of the programs.  Such program shall include information that explains the differences in funding opportunities from a scholarship program to a repayment program. (2)  (a)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the State Department of Health shall develop a mentoring program for students interested in participating in the Rural Physicians Retention Loan Repayment Program or the Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program, or who otherwise have indicated strong interest in practicing in rural communities across the state. (b)  The department, in conjunction with schools of medicine and dentistry accredited by the State of Mississippi, and in conjunction with hospitals, clinics, other health care facilities and communities described in subsection (2)(b) of Section 1 and subsection (2)(b) of Section 2 of this act, shall have the authority to provide students identified as candidates for the Rural Physicians Retention Loan Repayment Program or the Rural Dentists Retention Loan Repayment Program with faculty and practicing physician or dentist mentors, and to develop other programs designed to enhance the students' likelihood of admission to medical or dental school and practice in a rural area in the state after licensure. Such programs shall include providing students with the skills necessary for sustained and successful medical or dental practice in rural Mississippi. (3)  The State Department of Health shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the proper administration of the marketing, communications and mentoring programs described in this section, including rules for ensuring that the expenses of the programs during a fiscal year do not exceed funding available for the programs in that fiscal year. SECTION 4. (1)  Students and recipients of awards from the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program and the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program, respectively, shall be allowed to continue their participation in such programs, provided they otherwise meet the obligations and eligibility requirements set forth in Section 37-144-1 et seq., and 37-146-1 et seq. Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall not be construed to abridge the obligations or limitations of the scholarships and contracts of such programs. (2)  On and after July 1, 2026, no new scholarships shall be awarded under the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program or the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program, and no new students shall be admitted to either program. (3)  At such time that the last class of scholarship recipients complete the obligations of the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program and the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program, respectively, each program shall cease. SECTION 5.  Section 37-144-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-1.  There is established the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program for the purpose of identifying and recruiting qualified university and college students for medical or osteopathic school matriculation.  The program shall consist of three (3) distinct phases through which participants will progress, including: (a)  Undergraduate premedical education; (b)  Medical or osteopathic school and residency; and (c)  Post-residency entry into medical practice in a rural or underserved area of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 6.  Section 37-144-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-3.  (1) The Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program shall be administered by a commission to be known as the "Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Commission."  The commission shall be directed by a board composed of the following members: (a)  Two (2) generalist physicians appointed by and from the membership of the Mississippi State Medical Association, the term of which shall be three (3) years and may be reappointed for one (1) additional term; (b)  One (1) generalist physician appointed by and from the membership of each of the following organizations, the term of which shall be three (3) years and may be reappointed for one (1) additional term: (i)  Mississippi Academy of Family Physicians; (ii)  Mississippi Chapter, American College of Physicians; (iii)  Mississippi Chapter, American Academy of Pediatrics; (iv)  Mississippi Chapter, American College of OB-GYN; (v)  Mississippi Psychiatric Association; (vi)  Mississippi Medical and Surgical Association; (vii)  Mississippi Osteopathic Association; (c)  Two (2) designees of the Dean of the University of Mississippi School of Medicine whose terms are at the discretion of the dean, at least one (1) of whom is a member of the University of Mississippi School of Medicine Admissions Committee; (d)  Two (2) medical students, one (1) of whom shall be selected yearly through a process developed by the Dean of the School of Medicine in consultation with the Chairs of the Departments of Family Medicine, Internal Medicine, OB-GYN and Pediatrics, and one (1) of whom shall be nominated for a one-year term by the Mississippi Chapter of the Student National Medical Association and approved by the Dean of the University of Mississippi School of Medicine; (e)  A member of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning; (f)  The Chair of the Department of Family Medicine at the University of Mississippi School of Medicine; and (g)  A licensed psychiatrist appointed by the Mississippi Chapter of the American Psychiatric Association. (2)  The premedical advisors from the accredited four-year colleges and universities in the state and the directors or designees of the primary care generalist training programs in the State of Mississippi shall comprise an advisory committee to the commission to assist the commission in its administration of the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program. (3)  Vacancies on the commission must be filled in a manner consistent with the original appointments. (4)  All appointments to the commission must be made no later than September 1, 2024.  After the members are appointed, the Chair of the Department of Family Medicine shall set a date for the organizational meeting that is mutually acceptable to the majority of the commission members.  The organizational meeting shall be for the purposes of organizing the commission and establishing rules for transacting its business. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum at all commission meetings.  An affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting shall be required in the adoption of rules, reports and in any other actions taken by the commission.  At the organizational meeting, the commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from the members appointed according to paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (1).  The chair shall serve for a term of two (2) years, upon the expiration of which the vice chair shall assume the office of chair. (5)  After the organizational meeting, the commission shall hold no less than two (2) meetings annually. (6)  The commission may form an executive committee for the purpose of transacting business that must be conducted before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission.  All actions taken by the executive committee must be ratified by the commission at its next regularly scheduled meeting. (7)  Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed, subject to the availability of funding, for mileage and actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the commission. (8)  Funding for the establishment and continued operation of the program and commission shall be appropriated out of any money in the General Fund not already appropriated to the University of Mississippi Medical Center. SECTION 7.  Section 37-144-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-5.  The Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Commission shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  Developing the administrative policy for the commission and the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program; (b)  Promulgating rules and regulations, with the advice and consent of the University of Mississippi Medical Center, pertaining to the implementation and operation of the Rural Physicians Scholarship Program; (c)  Developing and implementing strategies and activities for the identification and recruitment of students and for marketing the program and for the implementation of the program.  In developing these strategies, the board shall seek the input of various organizations and entities, including the Mississippi State Medical Association, the Mississippi Academy of Family Physicians, the Mississippi Chapters of the American College of Physicians, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American College of OB-GYN, Mississippi Psychiatric Association, the Mississippi Medical and Surgical Association, the Mississippi Osteopathic Medicine Association and the American Psychiatric Association; (d)  Establishing a budget, with the advice and consent of the University of Mississippi Medical Center, to support the activities of the program and periodically reviewing and if appropriate, revising, the scholarship and other stipends offered through the program; (e)  Advising the University of Mississippi Medical Center regarding hiring an executive director and support staff necessary for the commission's work.  The commission shall nominate at least two (2) individuals to serve as executive director; (f)  Reviewing participants progress in the program and mentoring students and physicians participating in the program; (g)  Developing and participating in programs that provide initial practice support in collaboration with other interested professional organizations; (h)  The commission shall have the authority through use of generally applicable definitions, to designate an area of the state as underserved or rural.  The method by which these designations shall be made shall be contained in rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. (i)  The commission shall produce an annual report to the Legislature showing certain information relating to the program for the previous fiscal year, including the following: (i)  Budget, including funds provided in addition to legislative appropriations; (ii)  Number of participants enrolled in medical or osteopathic school along with their matriculation status; (iii)  The status of, to include location of practice, participants who have entered a medicine or other generalist residency program; (iv)  The number and cause of participants who breached their obligation(s) to the program; and (v)  The status of, to include location of practice, participants who have entered into the practice of medicine in a rural or medically underserved area in Mississippi. SECTION 8.  Section 37-144-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-7.  (1)  The commission shall develop and implement policies and procedures designed to recruit, identify and enroll undergraduate students who demonstrate necessary interest, commitment, aptitude and academic achievement to pursue careers as family physicians, psychiatrist, child psychiatrists or other generalist physicians in rural or medically underserved areas of Mississippi, and to develop and implement the programs designed to foster successful entry of participants into medical school, completion of medical school, enrollment into and completion of family medicine or other generalist residency, and establishment and maintenance of a career in family medicine, psychiatrist, child psychiatry or other generalist specialty in a rural or underserved area of Mississippi. (2)  The commission shall have the authority through use of generally applicable definitions to designate an area of the state as underserved or rural. (3)  The commission, in conjunction with the University of Mississippi Medical Center, shall have the authority to provide students selected for scholarship funding with faculty mentors and other programs designed to enhance the students' likelihood of admission to the medical school.  The commission and the University of Mississippi Medical Center will develop coursework that will provide scholarship students with the skills necessary for sustained and successful medical practice in rural Mississippi. (4)  Each applicant for admission to the program must submit an application to the commission that conforms to requirements established by the commission. (5)  In selecting participants for the program, the board may only accept an applicant if his or her academic record and other characteristics, if given consideration by the University of Mississippi School of Medicine Admissions Committee, would be considered credible and competitive. (6)  An applicant for the program may be admitted only upon a majority vote of the members of the commission. (7)  Not less than fifteen (15) students will be admitted to the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program each year, provided that there are fifteen (15) or more qualified applicants for the program. (8)  Upon the funding of sixty-one (61) or more rural physicians scholarships by the Legislature and recognizing the importance of balancing the needs of comprehensive primary care along with a critical shortage of psychiatrists in Mississippi, the commission may grant an exception for fourth-year medical or osteopathic school (M4) students who demonstrate a desire to practice psychiatry in rural Mississippi and who use a practice model and enter the practice of medicine in a rural or underserved area in Mississippi, as defined by the commission, beginning for the M4 Class of 2020. SECTION 9.  Section 37-144-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-9.  (1) Participants must adhere to the policies and practices as stipulated by the commission to continue in the program. (2)  Students in the program may receive tuition or other financial support that may be provided by the commission.  If a student in the program is admitted to and completes medical or osteopathic school, any tuition or other educational and living support provided to the student by the commission will be forgiven.  However, if the student is not successful in being accepted into medical or osteopathic school within three (3) years of entry into the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program, or if the student otherwise breaches his or her agreement with the commission, all financial assistance provided to the student must be repaid according to policies adopted by the board. SECTION 10.  Section 37-144-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-11.  (1) Students in the program may apply to any medical or osteopathic school that is accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education (LCME) or the American Osteopathic Association (AOA). (2)  Students in the program seeking admission to the University of Mississippi School of Medicine shall be eligible for a special admissions process pursuant to criteria established by the School of Medicine Admissions Committee which will include special consideration of the attributes of participation in the program. (3)  In carrying out the admissions process developed for the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program participants under this section, the goal is for the program to work with the School of Medicine to enhance the capability of participants to successfully enter and complete medical school, train in family medicine or other generalist primary care specialty and enter practice in rural or underserved areas in Mississippi.  To the extent feasible, the early admissions process should be completed before November 1 of the year preceding a student's admission to medical school. SECTION 11.  Section 37-144-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-13.  (1) Subject to the availability of funding, students in the program who successfully matriculate to medical or osteopathic school are eligible for ongoing financial support in accordance with policies and requirements of the commission and in accordance with the applicable laws and regulations.  The number of students to be supported at the University of Mississippi School of Medicine and at other schools will be established by policy prescribed by the commission. (2)  Subject to the availability of funding, students enrolled at a medical or osteopathic school in Mississippi may receive tuition support, funding to assist with the cost of books and a living stipend, as prescribed by policy of the commission and in accordance with applicable regulations.  Preferences for ongoing funding must be given to those students admitted to the University of Mississippi School of Medicine. (3)  For each year that a student in medical or osteopathic school receives financial assistance, the student is obligated for one (1) year of practice as a primary care physician in a rural or underserved area in Mississippi.  Breach of the agreement at any stage of training shall invoke the repayment of all financial assistance provided to the student through the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program, including assistance provided during undergraduate school, as well as in medical or osteopathic school, along with other penalties that may be prescribed in policy by the commission. SECTION 12.  Section 37-144-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-15.  Medical and osteopathic students in the program must enter family medicine or other generalist residency programs according to their choice of specialty. Depending upon the availability of funds, students who successfully enter residency programs which have been approved by the commission may receive further financial support from the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program subject to applicable rules and policies of the commission.  All funding for financial support from the commission to participants during their residency must be disbursed in accordance with applicable regulations. SECTION 13.  Section 37-144-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-17.  (1) Upon completion of residency, a participant in the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program must proceed to enter the practice of medicine in a rural or underserved area in Mississippi, as defined by the commission and consistent with generally acceptable designations.  If an area experiences significant changes in its medical or general community which are not reflected by health professional shortage area (HPSA) or medically underserved area (MUA) rural designation, the commission may receive testimony and, in its discretion, may qualify the area as an underserved or rural area to allow the program participant to fulfill his or her practice obligation. (2)  Upon entering the practice of medicine, a participant in the program must serve in a health professional shortage area (HPSA), medically underserved area (MUA), or rural area otherwise approved for practice under subsection (1) of this section for a number of years which corresponds to the number of years, not to exceed five (5), for which the participant received funding through the program.  A participant who completes residency who fails to enter the practice of medicine as required under this section shall be deemed in breach of contract and shall be liable for the immediate repayment of all financial assistance provided to the participant through the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program, including assistance provided during undergraduate school, as well as in medical or osteopathic school, along with other penalties that may be prescribed in policy by the board.  Any participant who fails to complete the period of practice for which he or she is obligated to provide services in a health professional shortage area (HPSA) or a medically underserved area (MUA) in exchange for financial assistance received through the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program shall be liable for the repayment of all financial assistance provided to the participant through the program, along with other penalties that may be prescribed by the commission, an amount which shall be reduced on a pro rata basis for actual years of practice by the physician in the area designated by the commission. SECTION 14.  Section 37-144-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-19.  The Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program, acting through the commission, shall make every effort to establish an initial practice entry support system for participants in the program. SECTION 15.  Section 37-144-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-144-21.  This chapter may not be construed as granting the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program or its governing commission any governing or administrative authority over any program administered by any college, university, medical school or residency program in this state or any other program established by state law. SECTION 16. The following shall be codified as Section 37-144-23, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-144-23.  Sections 37-144-1 through 37-144-21 shall stand repealed at such time as the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Commission certifies that the last class of scholarship recipients has completed the obligations of the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program. SECTION 17.  Section 37-146-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-1.  There is established the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program for the purpose of identifying and recruiting qualified university and college students for dental school matriculation.  Such program shall be known and may be cited as the Dr. G. Norris Howell Rural Dentists Scholarship Program.  The program shall consist of three (3) distinct phases through which participants will progress, including: (a)  Undergraduate pre-dental education; (b)  Dental school and residency; and (c)  Initial entry into dental practice in a rural or underserved area of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 18.  Section 37-146-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-3.  Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Commission; compensation; program funding.  (1) The Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program shall be administered by a commission to be known as the "Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Commission."  The commission shall be directed by a board composed of the following members: (a)  Two (2) dentists appointed by and from the membership of the Mississippi Dental Association, the term of which shall be three (3) years and who may be reappointed for one (1) additional term; (b)  One (1) dentist appointed by and from the membership of each of the following organizations, the term of which shall be three (3) years and who may be reappointed for one (1) additional term: (i)  Mississippi Dental Society; (ii)  Mississippi Academy of General Dentistry; and (iii)  Mississippi Chapter, American Academy of Pediatric Dentistry; (c)  Two (2) designees of the Dean of the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry whose terms are at the discretion of the dean, at least one (1) of whom is a member of the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry Admissions Committee; and (d)  Two (2) dental students, one (1) of whom shall be selected yearly through a process developed by the Dean of the School of Dentistry in consultation with the chairs of the various departments. (2)  The pre-professional advisors from the accredited four-year colleges and universities in the State of Mississippi shall comprise an advisory committee to the commission in the administration of the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program. (3)  Vacancies on the commission must be filled in a manner consistent with the original appointments. (4)  All appointments to the commission must be made no later than September 1, 2013.  After the members are appointed, the Program Director of the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program shall set a date for the organizational meeting that is mutually acceptable to the majority of the commission members.  The organizational meeting shall be for the purposes of organizing the commission and establishing rules for transacting its business.  A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum at all commission meetings.  An affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting shall be required in the adoption of rules, reports and in any other actions taken by the commission.  At the organizational meeting, the commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from the members appointed according to paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (1).  The chair shall serve for a term of two (2) years, upon the expiration of which, the vice chair shall assume the office of chair. (5)  After the organizational meeting, the commission shall hold no less than two (2) meetings annually. (6)  The commission may form an executive committee for the purpose of transacting business that must be conducted before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission.  All actions taken by the executive committee must be ratified by the commission at its next regularly scheduled meeting. (7)  Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed, subject to the availability of funding, for mileage and actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the commission, as provided in Section 25-3-41. (8)  Funding for the establishment and continued operation of the program and commission shall be appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not already appropriated to the University of Mississippi Medical Center. SECTION 19.  Section 37-146-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-5.  The Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Commission shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  Developing the administrative policy for the commission and the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program; (b)  Promulgating rules and regulations, with the advice and consent of the University of Mississippi Medical Center, pertaining to the implementation and operation of the Rural Dentists Scholarship Program; (c)  Developing and implementing strategies and activities for the identification and recruitment of students and for marketing the program and for the implementation of the program.  In developing these strategies, the board shall seek the input of various organizations and entities; (d)  Establishing a budget, with the advice and consent of the University of Mississippi Medical Center, to support the activities of the program and periodically reviewing and if appropriate, revising, the scholarship and other stipends offered through the program; (e)  Advising the University of Mississippi Medical Center regarding hiring appropriate staff necessary to work in conjunction with the Executive Director of the Mississippi Rural Physicians Scholarship Program; (f)  Reviewing participants' progress in the program and mentoring students and dentists participating in the program; (g)  The commission shall have the authority through use of generally applicable definitions, to designate an area of the state as underserved or rural.  The method by which these designations shall be made shall be contained in rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; (h)  The commission shall produce an annual report to the Legislature showing certain information relating to the program for the previous fiscal year, including the following: (i)  Budget, including funds provided in addition to legislative appropriations; (ii)  The number of participants enrolled in dental school along with their matriculation status; (iii)  The status of, to include location or practice, participants who have entered a dental residency program; (iv)  The number and cause of participants who breached their obligation(s) to the program; and (v)  The status of, to include location of practice, participants who have entered into the practice of dentistry in a rural or medically underserved area in Mississippi. SECTION 20.  Section 37-146-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-7.  Identification and recruitment of undergraduate participants; designation of underserved or rural area; applicant qualifications; maximum number of new admissions per year.  (1) The commission shall develop and implement policies and procedures designed to recruit, identify and enroll undergraduate students who demonstrate necessary interest, commitment, aptitude and academic achievement to pursue careers as dentists in rural or dentally underserved areas of Mississippi, and to develop and implement the programs designed to foster successful entry of participants into dental school, completion of dental school, and establishment and maintenance of a career in dentistry in a rural or underserved area of Mississippi. (2)  The commission shall have the authority through use of generally applicable definitions, to designate an area of the state as underserved or rural. (3)  The commission, in conjunction with the University of Mississippi Medical Center, shall have the authority to provide students selected for scholarship funding with faculty mentors and other programs designed to enhance the students' likelihood of admission to the dental school.  The commission and the University of Mississippi Medical Center will develop coursework that will help provide scholarship students with the skills necessary for sustained and successful dental practice in rural Mississippi. (4)  Each applicant for admission to the program must submit an application to the commission that conforms to requirements established by the commission. (5)  In selecting participants for the program, the board may only accept an applicant if his or her academic record and other characteristics, if given consideration by the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry Admissions Committee, would be considered credible and competitive. (6)  An applicant for the program may be admitted only upon a majority vote of the members of the commission. (7)  Up to three (3) students will be admitted to the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program each year. SECTION 21.  Section 37-146-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-9.  Participants to adhere to program policies and practices to remain in program; forgiveness or repayment of financial assistance under certain circumstances.  (1) Participants must adhere to the policies and practices as stipulated by the commission to continue in the program. (2)  Students in the program may receive tuition or other financial support that may be provided by the commission. If a student in the program is admitted to and completes dental school, any tuition or other educational and living support provided to the student by the commission will be forgiven.  However, if the student is not successful in being accepted into dental school within three (3) years of entry into the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program, or if the student otherwise breaches his or her agreement with the commission, all financial assistance provided to the student must be repaid according to policies adopted by the board. SECTION 22.  Section 37-146-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-11.  (1)  Students in the program may apply to the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry. (2)  Students in the program seeking admission to the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry shall be eligible for the admissions process pursuant to criteria established by the School of Dentistry Admissions Committee which will include consideration of the attributes of participation in the program. (3)  In carrying out the admissions process developed for the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program participants under this section, the goal is for the program to work with the School of Dentistry to enhance the capability of participants to successfully enter and complete dental school and enter practice in rural or underserved areas in Mississippi.  To the extent feasible, the early admissions process should be completed before December 1 of the year preceding a student's admission to dental school. SECTION 23.  Section 37-146-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-13.  Ongoing financial support for program participants who attend dental school; preference for ongoing support to University of Mississippi School of Dentistry students; students obligated for one year of practice for every year of financial assistance received.  (1)  Subject to the availability of funding, students in the program who successfully matriculate to dental school are eligible for ongoing financial support in accordance with policies and requirements of the commission and in accordance with the applicable laws and regulations.  The number of students to be supported at the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry and at other schools will be established by policy prescribed by the commission. (2)  Subject to the availability of funding, students enrolled at the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry may receive tuition support, funding to assist with the cost of books and a living stipend, as prescribed by policy of the commission and in accordance with applicable regulations.  Preferences for ongoing funding must be given to those students admitted to the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry. (3)  For each year that a student in dental school receives financial assistance, the student is obligated for one (1) year of practice as a dentist in a rural or underserved area in Mississippi.  Breach of the agreement at any stage of training shall invoke the repayment of all financial assistance provided to the student through the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program along with other penalties that may be prescribed in policy by the commission. SECTION 24.  Section 37-146-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-17.  Program participants required to enter practice of dentistry in health professional shortage, rural or underserved area upon completion of residency for number of years corresponding to number of years assistance received up to maximum of five years; breach of contract; liability for repayment.  (1)  Upon completion of dental school and/or a dental residency program approved by the commission, a participant in the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program must proceed to enter the full-time practice of dentistry in a rural or underserved area in Mississippi, as defined by the commission and consistent with generally acceptable designations.  If an area experiences significant changes in its dental or general community which are not reflected by dental health professional shortage area (HPSA), the commission may receive testimony and, in its discretion, may qualify the area as a dentally underserved or rural area to allow the program participant to fulfill his or her practice obligation. (2)  Upon entering the practice of dentistry, a participant in the program must serve in a dental health professional shortage area (HPSA) or rural area otherwise approved for practice under subsection (1) of this section for a number of years which corresponds to the number of years, not to exceed five (5), for which the participant received funding through the program.  Any participant who fails to complete the period of practice for which he or she is obligated to provide services in a dental health professional shortage area (HPSA) or rural area in exchange for financial assistance received through the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program shall be liable for the repayment of all financial assistance provided to the participant through the program, along with other penalties that may be prescribed by the commission, an amount which shall be reduced on a pro rata basis for actual years of practice by the dentist in the area designated by the commission. SECTION 25.  Section 37-146-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-19.  Initial practice entry support system for program participants.  The Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program, acting through the commission, shall make an effort to establish an initial practice entry support system for participants in the program. SECTION 26.  Section 37-146-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-146-21.  Limitation of program and commission governing and administrative authority.  This chapter may not be construed as granting the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program or its governing commission any governing or administrative authority over any program administered by any college, university, dental school or residency program in this state or any other program established by state law. SECTION 27.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-146-23, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-146-23.  Sections 371461 through 3714621 shall stand repealed at such time as the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Commission certifies that the last class of scholarship recipients has completed the obligations of the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program. SECTION 28.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.